el: Υλικό ολισθητήρα παπουτσιών κέρλινγκ: Γραφίτης; Πολυαιθυλένιο υψηλής πυκνότητας (HDPE); Πολυτετραφθοροαιθυλένιο (PTFE); Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Άλλο
ja: カーリングシューズのスライダー素材: グラファイト; 高密度ポリエチレン (HDPE); ポリテトラフルオロエチレン (PTFE); ステンレス; その他
sv: Material för curlingskor: Grafit; Högdensitetspolyeten (HDPE); Polytetrafluoreten (PTFE); Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
pt-PT: Material para deslizador de sapatos de curling: Grafite; Polietileno de alta densidade (HDPE); Politetrafluoretileno (PTFE); Aço inoxidável; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál klznej časti curlingovej obuvi: Grafit; Polyetylén s vysokou hustotou (HDPE); Polytetrafluóretylén (PTFE); Nerezová oceľ; Iné
fi: Curlingkengän liukumateriaali: Grafiitti; Korkeatiheyksinen polyeteeni (HDPE); Polytetrafluorieteeni (PTFE); Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
ru: Материал скользящей подошвы обуви для керлинга: Графит; Полиэтилен высокой плотности (HDPE); Политетрафторэтилен (PTFE); Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
zh-CN: 冰壶鞋滑块材质: 石墨; 高密度聚乙烯 (HDPE); 聚四氟乙烯 (PTFE); 不锈钢; 其他
hu: Curling cipő csúszótalpának anyaga: Grafit; Nagy sűrűségű polietilén (HDPE); Politetrafluoretilén (PTFE); Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
de: Material des Gleitelements des Curlingschuhs: Graphit; Hochdichtes Polyethylen (HDPE); Polytetrafluorethylen (PTFE); Edelstahl; Sonstige
zh-TW: 冰壺鞋滑片材質: 石墨; 高密度聚乙烯 (HDPE); 聚四氟乙烯 (PTFE); 不鏽鋼; 其他
da: Materiale til glidesko til curling: Grafit; High density-polyethylen (HDPE); Polytetrafluorethylen (PTFE); Rustfrit stål; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на плъзгача за обувка за кърлинг: Графит; Полиетилен с висока плътност (HDPE); Политетрафлуороетилен (PTFE); Неръждаема стомана; Други
pt-BR: Material do slider (deslizador) do tênis de curling: Grafite; Polietileno de alta densidade (PEAD); Politetrafluoretileno (PTFE); Aço inoxidável; Outro
en: Curling shoe slider material: Graphite; High-density polyethylene (HDPE); Polytetrafluoroethylene (PTFE); Stainless steel; Other
cs: Materiál sliderů pro curlingové boty: Grafit; Polyethylen s vysokou hustotou (HDPE); Polytetrafluorethylen (PTFE); Nerezová ocel; Ostatní
es: Material del deslizador del zapato de curling: Grafito; Polietileno de alta densidad (HDPE); Politetrafluoroetileno (PTFE); Acero inoxidable; Otro
sl-SI: Material drsalnega podplata čevljev za curling: Grafit; Polietilen visoke gostote (HDPE); Politetrafluoroetilen (PTFE); Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
fr: Matériau de glisseur de chaussure de curling: Graphite; Polyéthylène haute densité (HDPE); Polytétrafluoroéthylène (PTFE); Acier inoxydable; Autre
pl: Materiał ślizgu buta do curlingu: Grafit; Polietylen o wysokiej gęstości (HDPE); Politetrafluoroetylen (PTFE); Stal nierdzewna; Inne
tr: Körling ayakkabısı kaydırıcı malzemesi: Grafit; Yüksek yoğunluklu polietilen (HDPE); Politetrafloroetilen (PTFE); Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
nb: Materiale for curlingsko: Grafitt; Polyetylen med høy tetthet (HDPE); Polytetrafluoretylen (PTFE); Rustfritt stål; Annet
lt-LT: Kerlingo bato slydimo pado medžiaga: Grafitas; Didelio tankio polietilenas (HDPE); Politetrafluoretilenas (PTFE); Nerūdijantis plienas; Kita
it: Materiale per pattini da curling: Grafite; Polietilene ad alta densità (HDPE); Politetrafluoroetilene (PTFE); Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
nl: Curlingschoen slider materiaal: Grafiet; Hogedichtheidpolyethyleen (HDPE); Polytetrafluorethyleen (PTFE); Roestvrij staal; Overig
th: วัสดุของแผ่นสไลด์รองเท้าเคอร์ลิง: กราไฟต์; โพลิเอทิลีนความหนาแน่นสูง (HDPE); โพลิเตตราฟลูออโรเอทิลีน (PTFE); สเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Material pentru glisarea pantofilor de curling: Grafit; Polietilenă de înaltă densitate (HDPE); Politetrafluoretilenă (PTFE); Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
vi: Chất liệu đế giày curling: Than chì; Polyethylene mật độ cao (HDPE); Polytetrafluoroethylene (PTFE); Thép không gỉ; Khác
hr-HR: Materijal za klizače cipela za uvijanje: Grafit; Polietilen visoke gustoće (HDPE); Politetrafluoretilen (PTFE); Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
ko: 컬링화 슬라이더 재질: 그래파이트; 고밀도 폴리에틸렌(HDPE); 폴리테트라플루오로에틸렌(PTFE); 스테인리스 스틸; 기타